zh-TW: 動物/寵物補給品 > 寵物用品 > 寵物外出籠: 飛機用外出籠; 寵物後背包; 車用外出籠; 家具風格寵物籠; 硬殼外出籠; 滾輪外出籠; 寵物背袋; 軟殼外出籠; 軟殼提籠; 滾輪寵物車
nb: Produkter til dyr og husdyr > Husdyrprodukter > Husdyrbur og transportører: Luftfartsgodkjente bur; Bæremeiser; Bilbur; Bur i møbelstil; Bur med harde sider; Rullebur; Slynger og bærbare bur; Transportører med myke sider; Bur med myke sider; Bur med hjul
de: Tiere & Tierbedarf > Haustierbedarf > Transportboxen & -taschen: Für Flugreisen zugelassene Tragekörbe; Rucksackträger; Auto-Transportkäfige; Käfige im Möbelstil; Hartschalen-Tragekörbe; Rollbare Tragekörbe; Tragetücher und Kleidungs-Tragetaschen; Tragekörbe mit weichen Wänden; Käfige mit weichen Wänden; Tragekörbe mit Rädern
cs: Chovatelství > Potřeby pro domácí zvířata > Přepravky a boxy pro zvířata: Přepravky schválené pro cestování letadlem; Přepravní batohy; Klece do auta; Nábytkové klece; Přepravky s pevnými bočnicemi; Přepravky na kolečkách; Přepravní tašky a nosičky na hrudník; Přepravky s měkkými bočnicemi; Klece s měkkými bočnicemi; Přepravky s kolečky
bg-BG: Артикули за животни и домашни любимци > Артикули за домашни любимци > Кутии и чанти за транспорт на домашни любимци: Кутии за въздушен превоз; Раници за носене; Кутии за автомобили; Кутии тип мебел; Кутии с твърди стени; Кутии с колела; Слингове и други чанти за носене; Чанти с меки страни; Кошари с меки страни; Колички на колела
hu: Állatok és kisállatkellékek > Háziállat-kellékek > Háziállat-hordozók és -ládák: Légi közlekedés által engedélyezett hordozók; Háthordozók; Autós ládák; Bútor-stílusú ládák; Kemény oldalú hordozók; Guruló hordozók; Hevederek és hordható hordozók; Puha oldalú hordozók; Puha oldalú ládák; Kerekes hordozók
sl-SI: Živali in pripomočki za hišne ljubljenčke > Pripomočki za hišne ljubljenčke > Transporterji in boksi za hišne ljubljenčke: Transporterji za prevoz živali na letalu; Nahrbtni transporterji; Boksi za avto; Boksi v slogu pohištva; Transporterji s trdnim ohišjem; Transporterji s koleščki; Nosilke in transporterji za nošenje; Transporterji z mehkim ohišjem; Boksi z mehkim ohišjem; Torbe z mehkimi stranicami
nl: Dieren > Benodigdheden voor huisdieren > Transportmanden en -kooien voor huisdieren: Door luchtvaartmaatschappijen goedgekeurde transportmanden; Rugzaktransportmanden; Autotransportkooien; Transportkooien in meubelstijl; Harde transportmanden; Rollende transportmanden; Draagbanden en draagbare transportmanden; Zachte transportmanden; Zachte transportkooien; Transportmanden op wielen
vi: Đồ dùng cho động vật & thú cưng > Đồ dùng cho thú cưng > Giỏ và túi xách đựng thú cưng: Lồng vận chuyển hàng không được phê duyệt; Ba lô vận chuyển; Chuồng đặt trên xe ô tô; Chuồng có thiết kế đồ nội thất; Lồng có thành cứng; Túi có bánh xe; Giỏ xách & túi địu; Lồng có thành mềm; Chuồng có thành mềm; Lồng có bánh xe
pl: Zwierzęta i artykuły dla zwierząt > Artykuły dla zwierząt > Transportery i przenoski dla zwierząt: Atestowane transportery do przewozów lotniczych; Transportery plecakowe; Przenoski do samochodu; Przenoski pasujące do mebli; Sztywne transportery; Transportery na kółkach; Chusty i nosidełka; Miękkie transportery; Miękkie przenoski; Transportery na kołach
ro-RO: Animale și articole pentru animale de companie > Articole pentru animale de companie > Cuști de transport pentru transportul animalelor de companie: Cuști de transport aprobate pentru călătorii cu avionul; Rucsacuri de transport; Cuști pentru transportul cu mașina; Cuști tip mobilier; Cuști de transport cu margini întărite; Cuști de transport cu rotile; Marsupii și genți de transport purtabile; Genți de transport cu margini moi; Cuști de transport cu margini moi; Cuști de transport cu rotile
sv: Djur och tillbehör till husdjur > Tillbehör till husdjur > Burar och transportburar för husdjur: Godkända flygburar; Ryggsäckshållare; Bilburar; Burar i möbelstil; Burar med hårda väggar; Burar med hjul; Selar och bärväskor; Bärväskor med mjuka sidor; Burar med mjuka sidor; Bärväskor med hjul
zh-CN: 动物/宠物用品 > 宠物用品 > 外出宠物包/宠物袋: 随身携带空运宠物包; 宠物背包; 汽车运输宠物袋; 家具式宠物箱; 硬质宠物包; 滚轮宠物包; 吊挂和可穿戴宠物包; 软质宠物包; 软质宠物袋; 轮式宠物包
da: Dyr og tilbehør til kæledyr > Tilbehør til kæledyr > Transportbokse til kæledyr: Luftfartsgodkendte transportbokse; Rygsækbokse; Bilkasser; Kasser i møbelstil; Transportkasser med hårde sider; Rullekasser; Slynger og bærebare kasser; Transportkasser med bløde sider; Kasser med bløde sider; Kasser på hjul
es: Productos para mascotas y animales > Productos para mascotas > Transportines y cajas para mascotas: Transportines aprobados para viajes aéreos; Transportines de mochila; Jaulas para coches; Jaulas estilo mueble; Transportines rígidos; Transportines que pueden rodar; Canguros y transportines portátiles; Transportines con laterales acolchados; Jaulas con laterales acolchados; Transportines con ruedas
ko: 동물/반려동물 용품 > 반려동물 용품 > 반려동물 캐리어/케이지: 항공기 반입 승인 캐리어; 배낭 캐리어; 차량용 케이지; 가구식 케이지; 하드사이드 캐리어; 바퀴식 캐리어; 슬링백/웨어러블 캐리어; 소프트사이드 캐리어; 소프트사이드 케이지; 바퀴 달린 캐리어
fr: Animaux et articles pour animaux de compagnie > Articles pour animaux de compagnie > Cages de transport pour animaux de compagnie: Transporteurs agréés pour le transport aérien; Transporteurs sacs à dos; Caisses de voiture; Caisses de style meuble; Transporteurs à parois rigides; Transporteurs roulants; Écharpes et supports portables; Transporteurs à parois souples; Caisses à parois souples; Transporteurs à roues
en: Animals & Pet Supplies > Pet Supplies > Pet Carriers & Crates: Air Travel Approved Carriers; Backpack Carriers; Car Crates; Furniture-Style Crates; Hard-Sided Carriers; Rolling Carriers; Slings & Wearable Carriers; Soft-Sided Carriers; Soft-Sided Crates; Wheeled Carriers
hr-HR: Životinje i potrepštine za kućne ljubimce > Potrepštine za kućne ljubimce > Nosiljke i transporteri za kućne ljubimce: Nosiljke prigodne za zrakoplov; Nosiljke za nošenje na leđima; Transporteri za automobil; Transporteri u obliku namještaja; Tvrde nosiljke; Nosiljke s kolima; Marame za nošenje i nosiljke; Mekane nosiljke; Mekani transporteri; Nosiljke s kotačima
pt-PT: Artigos para animais e animais estimação > Artigos para animais > Transportadoras e gaiolas para animais de estimação: Transportadoras para cabine aérea; Mochilas transportadoras; Caixas transportadoras para carros; Caixas transportadoras estilo mobiliário; Transportadoras rígidas; Transportadores rolantes; Transportadoras com correias e usáveis; Transportadoras maleáveis; Caixas transportadoras maleáveis; Transportadores com rodas
pt-BR: Animais e produtos para animais de estimação > Suprimentos para animais de estimação > Bolsas e caixas para transporte de animais: Caixas para transporte aprovadas para viagens aéreas; Caixas para transporte tipo mochila; Caixas para carros; Caixas estilo móveis; Caixas para transporte rígidas; Caixas para transporte com rodas; Caixas para transporte com eslingas e vestíveis; Caixas para transporte com laterais macias; Caixas com laterais macias; Caixas de transporte de rodinhas
ja: ペット・ペット用品 > ペット用品 > ペット用キャリー・クレート: 航空旅行認定キャリー; バックパックキャリー; 車用クレート; 家具スタイルのクレート; ハードサイドキャリー; ローリングキャリー; 抱っこ紐; ソフトサイドキャリー; ソフトサイドクレート; ホイール付きキャリー
ru: Животные и товары для питомцев > Товары для домашних животных > Переноски и клетки для домашних животных: Переноски для самолетов; Рюкзаки-переноски; Клетки для автомобилей; Интерьерные клетки; Пластиковые переноски; Переноски с колесиками; Переноски-слинги; Тканевые переноски; Тканевые клетки; Переноски-тележки
it: Articoli per animali > Animali domestici - Articoli > Gabbie e trasportini per animali domestici: Trasportini approvati per i viaggi aerei; Portazaini; Gabbie per auto; Gabbie in stile mobile; Trasportatori rigidi; Portaerei girevoli; Imbracature e marsupi indossabili; Trasportatori con lato morbido; Gabbie con lato morbido; Trasportatori a ruote
fi: Eläinten ja lemmikkieläinten tarvikkeet > Lemmikkieläinten tarvikkeet > Lemmikin kuljetus- ja kantolaatikot: Lentomatkailuun hyväksytyt kuljetuslaatikot; Kuljetusreput; Kissalaatikot; Huonekalutyyliset laatikot; Kovat laatikot; Vedettävät laatikot; Kantoliinat ja muut puettavat kantoratkaisut; Pehmeät laatikot; Pehmeät kuljetuslaatikot; Pyörälliset laatikot
tr: Hayvanlar ve Evcil Hayvan Ürünleri > Evcil Hayvan Ürünleri > Evcil Hayvan Taşıma Çantaları ve Sandıkları: Hava Yolculuğu Onaylı Taşıyıcılar; Sırt Çantası Taşıyıcılar; Araba Kasaları; Mobilya Tarzı Kasalar; Sert Taraflı Taşıyıcılar; Tekerlekli Evcil Hayvan Taşıma Çantaları; Askılar ve Giyilebilir Taşıyıcılar; Yumuşak Taraflı Taşıyıcılar; Yumuşak Kenarlı Kasalar; Tekerlekli Evcil Hayvan Taşıma Çantaları
sk-SK: Potreby pre zvieratá a domácich miláčikov > Potreby pre domácich miláčikov > Nosiče a prepravky pre domácich miláčikov: Schválené letecké prepravky; Batohové nosiče; Prepravky do auta; Nábytkové prepravky; Vystužené nosiče; Rolovacie nosiče; Nosiče s popruhmi; Nevystužené nosiče; Nevystužené prepravky; Nosiče s kolieskami
th: อุปกรณ์สำหรับสัตว์และสัตว์เลี้ยง > อุปกรณ์สัตว์เลี้ยง > ที่ใส่สัตว์เลี้ยง: อุปกรณ์พกพาที่ได้รับการรับรองว่าโดยสารทางอากาศได้; ที่ใส่สัตว์เลี้ยงแบบเป้สะพายหลัง; กรงขึ้นรถ; กรงใส่สัตว์เลี้ยงสไตล์เฟอร์นิเจอร์; ที่ใส่สัตว์เลี้ยงแบบด้านข้างแข็ง; กรงมีล้อลาก; สลิงและกระเป๋าสัตว์เลี้ยงแบบสวมใส่; ที่ใส่สัตว์เลี้ยงแบบด้านข้างนุ่ม; กรงใส่สัตว์เลี้ยงแบบด้านข้างนุ่ม; ที่ใส่สัตว์เลี้ยงแบบติดล้อ
el: Ζώα και προμήθειες για κατοικίδια ζώα > Προμήθειες για κατοικίδια ζώα > Μεταφορείς & κλουβιά κατοικίδιων ζώων: Εγκεκριμένοι μεταφορείς για αεροπορικά ταξίδια; Μάρσιποι μεταφοράς τύπου σακιδίου; Κλουβιά για αυτοκίνητα; Κλουβιά σε στυλ επίπλων; Μεταφορείς με σκληρά τοιχώματα; Μεταφορείς με ροδάκια; Φορητοί μεταφορείς και σακίδια; Μεταφορείς με μαλακά τοιχώματα; Κλουβιά με μαλακά τοιχώματα; Μεταφορείς με τροχούς
lt-LT: Gyvūnai ir prekės naminiams gyvūnams > Prekės naminiams gyvūnams > Nešynės ir dėžės naminiams gyvūnams: Nešynės, patvirtintos naudoti lėktuvuose; Kuprinės tipo nešynės; Automobilinės dėžės; Baldų stiliaus dėžės; Nešynės kietais šonais; Ridenamos nešynės; Nešiojimo diržai ir dėvimos nešynės; Nešynės minkštais šonais; Dėžės minkštais šonais; Nešynės su ratukais